Wisconsin, session 2025, SB607.
do enact as follows:SB607,11Section 1. 29.089 (2) (a), (b) and (c) of the statutes are amended to read:SB607,3,4229.089 (2) (a) A person who is employed in this state by a public agency as a 3law enforcement officer and to whom s. 941.23 (1) (g) 2. to 5. and (2) (b) 1. to 3. 4applies who is in compliance with 18 USC 926B.SB607,3,65(b) A qualified out-of-state law enforcement officer, as defined in s. 941.23 (1) 6(g), to whom s. 941.23 (2) (b) 1. to 3. applies who is in compliance with 18 USC 926B.SB607,4,21(c) A former law enforcement officer, as defined in s. 941.23 (1) (c), to whom s. 2941.23 (2) (c) 1. to 7. applies who is in compliance with 18 USC 926C.SB607,23Section 2. 29.091 (2) (a), (b) and (c) of the statutes are amended to read:SB607,4,6429.091 (2) (a) A person who is employed in this state by a public agency as a 5law enforcement officer and to whom s. 941.23 (1) (g) 2. to 5. and (2) (b) 1. to 3. 6applies who is in compliance with 18 USC 926B.SB607,4,87(b) A qualified out-of-state law enforcement officer, as defined in s. 941.23 (1) 8(g), to whom s. 941.23 (2) (b) 1. to 3. applies who is in compliance with 18 USC 926B.SB607,4,109(c) A former law enforcement officer, as defined in s. 941.23 (1) (c), to whom s. 10941.23 (2) (c) 1. to 7. applies who is in compliance with 18 USC 926C.SB607,311Section 3. 29.301 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB607,4,151229.301 (1) (b) No person may hunt within 1,700 1,200 feet of any hospital, 13sanatorium, or the grounds of any school. The department may designate the form 14for or furnish signs designating the restricted area. No person may be convicted of 15a violation of this paragraph unless the restricted area is designated by the signs.SB607,416Section 4. 29.621 (4) (a), (b) and (c) of the statutes are amended to read:SB607,4,191729.621 (4) (a) A person who is employed in this state by a public agency as a 18law enforcement officer and to whom s. 941.23 (1) (g) 2. to 5. and (2) (b) 1. to 3. 19applies who is in compliance with 18 USC 926B.SB607,4,2120(b) A qualified out-of-state law enforcement officer, as defined in s. 941.23 (1) 21(g), to whom s. 941.23 (2) (b) 1. to 3. applies who is in compliance with 18 USC 926B.SB607,4,2322(c) A former law enforcement officer, as defined in s. 941.23 (1) (c), to whom s. 23941.23 (2) (c) 1. to 7. applies who is in compliance with 18 USC 926C.SB607,51Section 5. 110.07 (1) (a) 1. and 3. and (b) of the statutes are amended to read:SB607,5,52110.07 (1) (a) 1. Enforce and assist in the administration of this chapter and 3chs. 194, 218, 341 to 349 and 351, and ss. 23.33, 23.335, 125.07 (4) (b), 125.085 (3) 4(b), 167.31 (2) (b) to (c) and (d) and 287.81 and ch. 350 where applicable to 5highways, or orders or rules issued pursuant thereto.SB607,5,1063. Have authority to enter any place where vehicles subject to this chapter, ss. 7167.31 (2) (b) to (c) and (d) and 287.81 and chs. 194, 218 and 341 to 350 are stored or 8parked at any time to examine such vehicles, or to stop such vehicles while en route 9at any time upon the public highways to examine the same and make arrests for all 10violations thereof.SB607,5,1511(b) All municipal judges, judges, district attorneys and law enforcement 12officers shall assist in enforcing this chapter, ss. 167.31 (2) (b) to (c) and (d) and 13287.81 and chs. 194, 218 and 341 to 351, and orders or rules issued pursuant 14thereto and shall report to the department the disposition of every uniform traffic 15citation issued for cases involving those chapters.SB607,616Section 6. 167.31 (1) (cm) and (e) and (2) (a) and (b) of the statutes are 17repealed.SB607,718Section 7. 167.31 (2) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB607,5,2119167.31 (2) (c) Except as provided in sub. (4), no person may load a firearm, 20other than a handgun, in a vehicle or discharge a firearm or airgun or shoot a bolt or 21an arrow from a bow or crossbow in or from a vehicle.SB607,822Section 8. 167.31 (2) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB607,6,223167.31 (2) (d) Except as provided in sub. (4) (a), (bg), (cg), (e), (fm), (g), and (k), 1no person may discharge a firearm or airgun or shoot a bolt or an arrow from a bow 2or crossbow from or across a highway or within 50 feet of the center of a roadway.SB607,93Section 9. 167.31 (2) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:SB607,6,54167.31 (2) (e) A person who violates pars. (a) to par. (c) or (d) is subject to a 5forfeiture of not more than $100.SB607,106Section 10. 167.31 (3) (a) (intro.) and 1. of the statutes are consolidated, 7renumbered 167.31 (3) (a) and amended to read:SB607,6,118167.31 (3) (a) Except as provided in sub. (4), no person may do any of the 9following: 1. Place place, possess, or transport a firearm, bow, or crossbow in or on 10a commercial aircraft, unless the firearm is unloaded and encased or unless the bow 11or crossbow is unstrung or is enclosed in a carrying case.SB607,1112Section 11. 167.31 (3) (a) 2. of the statutes is repealed.SB607,1213Section 12. 167.31 (4) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB607,6,1814167.31 (4) (a) (intro.) Subsections The prohibitions in subs. (2) and (3) do not 15apply to any of the following who, are acting in the line of duty, place, possess, 16transport, load or discharge a firearm or airgun in, on or from a vehicle, motorboat 17or aircraft or discharge a firearm or airgun from or across a highway or within 50 18feet of the center of a roadway:SB607,1319Section 13. 167.31 (4) (a) 1. of the statutes is created to read:SB607,6,2020167.31 (4) (a) 1. A peace officer.SB607,1421Section 14. 167.31 (4) (ag) of the statutes is repealed.SB607,1522Section 15. 167.31 (4) (am) of the statutes is repealed.SB607,1623Section 16. 167.31 (4) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB607,7,41167.31 (4) (b) Subsections (2) (a), (b) and (c), (3) (a) and (b), and (3m) do not 2apply to the holder of a scientific research license under s. 169.25 or a scientific 3collector permit under s. 29.614 who is using a net gun or tranquilizer gun in an 4activity related to the purpose for which the license or permit was issued.SB607,175Section 17. 167.31 (4) (bg), (bn) and (bt) of the statutes are repealed.SB607,186Section 18. 167.31 (4) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB607,7,97167.31 (4) (c) Subsection (2) (b) and (c) does not apply to the holder of a 8Class A or Class B permit under s. 29.193 (2) who is hunting from a stationary 9vehicle.SB607,1910Section 19. 167.31 (4) (cg) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb607 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb607 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB607 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB607 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB607: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting